District of Columbia statutes.
42-3531.03

Findings.

The Council finds that, despite the fact that the District has some of the most comprehensive pro-tenant laws in the United States:

(a)

(1)

Tenants in the District are under-informed of their rights.

(2)

It is difficult for tenants to obtain information.

(3)

Tenants cannot usually afford legal representation.

(4)

Tenants are under-informed about dispute mediation and adjudication options available to tenants in the District through the courts and through the Office of the Attorney General.

(5)

Few tenants have time for self-advocacy because of their full-time employment.

(6)

Tenants in the District need an independent Chief Tenant Advocate to act on their behalf as repository of information and resources to help guide tenants through the landlord-tenant system in the District.

(7)

The establishment of an independent Office of the Tenant Advocate will provide a valuable resource for the government and residents of the District.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2063, 52 DCR 7503
Oct. 1, 2007, D.C. Law 16-181, § 2(c), 53 DCR 6703
Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “Section 2 through 4 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2063 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
D.C. Law 16-181, in par. (6), substituted “independent Chief Tenant Advocate” for “office at the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs”; and, in par. (7), substituted “independent Office of the Tenant Advocate” for “Office of the Tenant Advocate within the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs”.